Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXI Debtor-Creditor Relations
CHAPTER 377 Bulk Sales
[Superseded]

377.010.
Construction and application of chapter. [Repealed.]

377.020.
Bulk sales of merchandise or fixtures; statement of creditors of vendor required. [Repealed.]

377.030.
Notice of proposed sale to be given creditors of vendor. [Repealed.]

377.040.
Application of purchase money. [Repealed.]

377.050.
When sale is deemed fraudulent and void; effect of such sale; limitation of action to invalidate. [Repealed.]

377.060.
Vendor not to make an incomplete or false statement. [Repealed.]

377.070.
Vendor may require security from purchaser. [Repealed.]

377.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]